el: Πρότυπο ασφαλείας για θαλάσσια σπορ: ASTM F1492; CE EN 1385; CE EN 393; ISO 12402-5; ISO 12402-6; USCG Τύπου II; USCG Τύπου III; USCG Τύπου V; Άλλο
sv: Säkerhetsstandard för vattensporter: ASTM F1492; CE EN 1385; CE EN 393; ISO 12402-5; ISO 12402-6; USCG typ II; USCG typ III; USCG typ V; Övrigt
ro-RO: Standard de siguranță pentru sporturi nautice: ASTM F1492; CE EN 1385; CE EN 393; ISO 12402-5; ISO 12402-6; USCG Type II; USCG Type III; USCG Type V; Altele
da: Sikkerhedsstandard for vandsport: ASTM F1492; CE EN 1385; CE EN 393; ISO 12402-5; ISO 12402-6; USCG Type II; USCG Type III; USCG Type V; Andet
tr: Su sporları güvenlik standardı: ASTM F1492; CE EN 1385; CE EN 393; ISO 12402-5; ISO 12402-6; USCG Tip II; USCG Tip III; USCG Tip V; Diğer
ru: Стандарт безопасности для водных видов спорта: ASTM F1492; CE EN 1385; CE EN 393; ISO 12402-5; ISO 12402-6; USCG Type II; USCG Type III; USCG Type V; Другое
de: Sicherheitsstandard für Wassersport: ASTM F1492; CE EN 1385; CE EN 393; ISO 12402-5; ISO 12402-6; USCG Typ II; USCG Typ III; USCG Typ V; Sonstige
nb: Sikkerhetsstandard for vannsport: ASTM F1492; CE EN 1385; CE EN 393; ISO 12402-5; ISO 12402-6; USCG type II; USCG type III; USCG type V; Annet
bg-BG: Стандарт за безопасност при водни спортове: ASTM F1492; CE EN 1385; CE EN 393; ISO 12402-5; ISO 12402-6; USCG тип II; USCG тип III; USCG тип V; Други
sk-SK: Bezpečnostné normy pre vodné športy: ASTM F1492; CE EN 1385; CE EN 393; ISO 12402-5; ISO 12402-6; USCG Type II; USCG Type III; USCG Type V; Iné
vi: Tiêu chuẩn an toàn thể thao dưới nước: ASTM F1492; CE EN 1385; CE EN 393; ISO 12402-5; ISO 12402-6; USCG Loại II; USCG Loại III; USCG Loại V; Khác
cs: Bezpečnostní standardy pro vodní sporty: ASTM F1492; CE EN 1385; CE EN 393; ISO 12402-5; ISO 12402-6; USCG Type II; USCG Type III; USCG Type V; Jiné
en: Water sports safety standard: ASTM F1492; CE EN 1385; CE EN 393; ISO 12402-5; ISO 12402-6; USCG Type II; USCG Type III; USCG Type V; Other
hu: Vízi sportok biztonsági szabványa: ASTM F1492; CE EN 1385; CE EN 393; ISO 12402-5; ISO 12402-6; USCG Type II; USCG Type III; USCG Type V; Egyéb
lt-LT: Vandens sporto saugos standartas: ASTM F1492; CE EN 1385; CE EN 393; ISO 12402-5; ISO 12402-6; USCG Type II; USCG Type III; USCG Type V; Kita
pt-BR: Esportes aquáticos padrão de segurança: ASTM F1492; CE EN 1385; CE EN 393; ISO 12402-5; ISO 12402-6; USCG Tipo II; USCG Tipo III; USCG Tipo V; Outros
zh-TW: 水上運動安全標準: ASTM F1492; CE EN 1385; CE EN 393; ISO 12402-5; ISO 12402-6; USCG Type II; USCG Type III; USCG Type V; 其他
es: Norma de seguridad para deportes acuáticos: ASTM F1492; CE EN 1385; CE EN 393; ISO 12402-5; ISO 12402-6; USCG tipo II; USCG tipo III; USCG tipo V; Otro
hr-HR: Standard sigurnosti za vodene sportove: ASTM F1492; CE EN 1385; CE EN 393; ISO 12402-5; ISO 12402-6; USCG Type II; USCG Type III; USCG Type V; Ostalo
it: Standard di sicurezza per gli sport acquatici: ASTM F1492; CE EN 1385; CE EN 393; ISO 12402-5; ISO 12402-6; USCG Tipo II; USCG Tipo III; USCG Tipo V; Altro
pl: Norma bezpieczeństwa sportów wodnych: ASTM F1492; CE EN 1385; CE EN 393; ISO 12402-5; ISO 12402-6; USCG Type II; USCG Type III; USCG Type V; Inne
ko: 수상 스포츠 안전 기준: ASTM F1492; CE EN 1385; CE EN 393; ISO 12402-5; ISO 12402-6; USCG Type II; USCG Type III; USCG Type V; 기타
fr: Norme de sécurité pour les sports nautiques: ASTM F1492; CE EN 1385; CE EN 393; ISO 12402-5; ISO 12402-6; USCG Type II; USCG Type III; USCG Type V; Autre
fi: Vesiurheilun turvallisuusstandardi: ASTM F1492; CE EN 1385; CE EN 393; ISO 12402-5; ISO 12402-6; USCG Type II; USCG Type III; USCG Type V; Muu
ja: ウォータースポーツ安全基準: ASTM F1492; CE EN 1385; CE EN 393; ISO 12402-5; ISO 12402-6; USCG Type II; USCG Type III; USCG Type V; その他
pt-PT: Norma de segurança para desportos aquáticos: ASTM F1492; CE EN 1385; CE EN 393; ISO 12402-5; ISO 12402-6; USCG Tipo II; USCG Tipo III; USCG Tipo V; Outro
sl-SI: Varnostni standard za vodne športe: ASTM F1492; CE EN 1385; CE EN 393; ISO 12402-5; ISO 12402-6; USCG, tip II; USCG, tip III; USCG, tip V; Drugo
zh-CN: 水上运动安全标准: ASTM F1492; CE EN 1385; CE EN 393; ISO 12402-5; ISO 12402-6; USCG Type II; USCG Type III; USCG Type V; 其他
th: มาตรฐานความปลอดภัยสำหรับกีฬาทางน้ำ: ASTM F1492; CE EN 1385; CE EN 393; ISO 12402-5; ISO 12402-6; USCG Type II; USCG Type III; USCG Type V; อื่นๆ
nl: Watersport veiligheidsnorm: ASTM F1492; CE EN 1385; CE EN 393; ISO 12402-5; ISO 12402-6; USCG Type II; USCG Type III; USCG Type V; Overige